North Carolina statutes. Chapter 8C. Evidence Code.
Article 6. Witnesses.
Rule 611.
Mode and order of interrogation and presentation.

Control by court. — The court shall exercise reasonable control over the mode and order of interrogating witnesses and presenting evidence so as to (1) make the interrogation and presentation effective for the ascertainment of the truth, (2) avoid needless consumption of time, and (3) protect witnesses from harassment or undue embarrassment.

Scope of cross-examination. — A witness may be cross-examined on any matter relevant to any issue in the case, including credibility.

Leading questions. — Leading questions should not be used on the direct examination of a witness except as may be necessary to develop his testimony. Ordinarily leading questions should be permitted on cross-examination. When a party calls a hostile witness, an adverse party, or a witness identified with an adverse party, interrogation may be by leading questions.

History.

1983, c. 701, s. 1.

Commentary

This rule, except for subdivision (b), is identical to Fed. R. Evid. 611.

The rule sets forth the objectives the court should seek to obtain rather than spelling out detailed rules. Specific statutes relating to the mode and order of interrogating witnesses and presenting evidence, e.g.,

G.S. 15A-1226

dealing with when rebuttal evidence may be presented, will not be overridden by the general guidelines set by this rule.

The Advisory Committee’s Note says that:

“Item (1) restates in broad terms the power and obligation of the judge as developed under common law principles. It covers such concerns as whether testimony shall be in the form of a free narrative or responses to specific questions, McCormick § 5, the order of calling witnesses and presenting evidence, 6 Wigmore § 1867, the use of demonstrative evidence, McCormick § 179, and the many other questions arising during the course of a trial which can be solved only by the judge’s common sense and fairness in view of the particular circumstances.

Item (2) is addressed to avoidance of needless consumption of time, a matter of daily concern in the disposition of cases. A companion piece is found in the discretion vested in the judge to exclude evidence as a waste of time in Rule 403(b).

Item (3) calls for a judgment under the particular circumstances whether interrogation tactics entail harassment or undue embarrassment. Pertinent circumstances include the importance of the testimony, the nature of the inquiry, its relevance to credibility, waste of time, and confusion. McCormick § 42. In
Alford
v.

United States,

282 U.S. 687, 694, 51 S. Ct. 218, 75 L. Ed. 624 (1931), the Court pointed out that, while the trial judge should protect the witness from questions which ‘go beyond the bounds of proper cross-examination merely to harass, annoy or humiliate,’ this protection by no means forecloses efforts to discredit the witness. Reference to the transcript of the prosecutor’s cross-examination in

Berger

v.

United States,

295 U.S. 78, 55 S. Ct. 629, 79 L. Ed. 1314 (1935), serves to lay at rest any doubts as to the need for judicial control in this area.

The inquiry into specific instances of conduct of a witness allowed under Rule 608(b) is, of course, subject to this rule.”

Subdivision (b) deals with the scope of cross-examination. “In North Carolina the substantive cross-examination is not confined to the subject matter of direct testimony plus impeachment, but may extend to any matter relevant to the issues.”
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 35, at 143 (1982). Subdivision (b) rejects the more restricted approach to cross-examination found in Fed. R. Evid. 611(b) and adopts the current North Carolina wide-open cross-examination rule.

Subdivision (c) continues the traditional view that the suggestive powers of the leading question are as general propositions undesirable. Within this tradition numerous exceptions have achieved recognition: The witness who is hostile, unwilling or biased; the child witness or the adult with communication problems; the witness whose recollection is exhausted; and undisputed preliminary matters. 3 Wigmore §§ 774-778;
State
v.

Greene,

285 N.C. 482

(1974). As the Advisory Committee’s Note points out: “The matter clearly falls within the area of control by the judge over the mode and order of interrogation and presentation and accordingly is phrased in words of suggestion rather than command.”

The Note states that:

“The rule also conforms to tradition in making the use of leading questions on cross-examination a matter of right. The purpose of the qualification ‘ordinarily’ is to furnish a basis for denying the use of leading questions when the cross-examination is cross-examination in form only and not in fact, as for example the ‘cross-examination’ of a party by his own counsel after being called by the opponent (savoring more of redirect) or of an insured defendant who proves to be friendly to the plaintiff.”

The last sentence of subdivision (c) deals with categories of witnesses automatically regarded and treated as hostile. N.C. Civ. Pro. Rule 43(b) permits leading questions to “an adverse party or an agent or employee of an adverse party, or an officer, director, or employee of a private corporation or of a partnership or association which is an adverse party, or an officer, agent or employee of a state, county or municipal government or agency thereof which is an adverse party.” The phrase of the rule “witness identified with” an adverse party is designed to enlarge the category of witnesses who may safely be regarded as hostile without further demonstration. Upon adoption of this rule, N.C. Civ. Pro. Rule 43(b) should be repealed. N.C. Civ. Pro. Rule 30 should be amended to state that depositions are subject to the North Carolina Rules of Evidence.

Legal Periodicals.

For Survey of Developments in North Carolina Law (1992), see 71 N.C.L. Rev. 1893 (1993).

Rule 612.
Writing or object used to refresh memory.

While testifying. — If, while testifying, a witness uses a writing or object to refresh his memory, an adverse party is entitled to have the writing or object produced at the trial, hearing, or deposition in which the witness is testifying.

Before testifying. — If, before testifying, a witness uses a writing or object to refresh his memory for the purpose of testifying and the court in its discretion determines that the interests of justice so require, an adverse party is entitled to have those portions of any writing or of the object which relate to the testimony produced, if practicable, at the trial, hearing, or deposition in which the witness is testifying.

Terms and conditions of production and use. — A party entitled to have a writing or object produced under this rule is entitled to inspect it, to cross-examine the witness thereon, and to introduce in evidence those portions which relate to the testimony of the witness. If production of the writing or object at the trial, hearing, or deposition is impracticable, the court may order it made available for inspection. If it is claimed that the writing or object contains privileged information or information not directly related to the subject matter of the testimony, the court shall examine the writing or object in camera, excise any such portions, and order delivery of the remainder to the party entitled thereto. Any portion withheld over objections shall be preserved and made available to the appellate court in the event of an appeal. If a writing or object is not produced, made available for inspection, or delivered pursuant to order under this rule, the court shall make any order justice requires, but in criminal cases if the prosecution elects not to comply, the order shall be one striking the testimony or, if justice so requires, declaring a mistrial.

History.

1983, c. 701, s. 1.

Commentary

This rule is a reorganization of Fed. R. Evid. 612 and differs substantively from the federal rule in five ways. The rule omits a reference to the Jencks Act. Also, it states explicitly that it applies to trials, hearings and depositions and that it applies to objects as well as writings. The rule explicitly provides for inspection of the writing or object if production of the object or writing at the trial is impracticable. Finally, subsection (c) adds privileged information to the grounds which may be the basis of an
in camera
examination and excision by the court.

If the writing is used by the witness while testifying to refresh his memory, the adverse party is entitled to production. If the writing is used before testifying for the purpose of testifying, disclosure is in the discretion of the court. Requiring disclosure of writings used before testifying is a change in North Carolina practice. See, e.g.,
State
v.

Cross,

293 N.C. 296

(1977).

As the Advisory Committee’s Note points out:

“The purpose of the phrase ‘for the purpose of testifying’ is to safeguard against using the rule as a pretext for wholesale exploration of an opposing party’s files and to insure that access is limited only to those writings which may fairly be said in fact to have an impact upon the testimony of the witness.”

The phrase “for the purpose of testifying” read together with the phrase “and the court in its discretion determines that the interests of justice so require” are intended to maintain the work product “privilege” for lawyers and others who assist in preparation for trial and in most instances it is likely that the judge will exercise his discretion in such a manner to prevent discovery of statements used before testifying to refresh a witness’ recollection. Saltzburg and Redden,
Federal Rules of Evidence Manual,
p. 417 (3d ed. 1982).

In subsection (c), by adding privileged information to those items which the court may consider
in camera
with possible excision of the material, the intention was to make it clear that the rule does not invade the existing authority of the court in areas such as protecting the confidentiality of the informants.

On the other hand, exculpatory writings are available to criminal defendants irrespective of Rule 612. See
United States
v.

Agurs,

427 U.S. 97 (1976);

United States

v.

Nobles,

422 U.S. 225 (1975);

Brady

v.

Maryland,

373 U.S. 83 (1963);

State

v.

Hardy,

293 N.C. 105

(1977).

Rule 613.
Prior statements of witnesses.

In examining a witness concerning a prior statement made by him, whether written or not, the statement need not be shown nor its contents disclosed to him at that time, but on request the same shall be shown or disclosed to opposing counsel.

History.

1983, c. 701, s. 1.

Commentary

This rule is identical to subdivision (a) of Fed. R. Evid. 613. There are no North Carolina cases on the subject matter of subdivision (a).

The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“The Queen’s Case, 2 Br. & B. 284, 129 Eng. Rep. 976 (1820), laid down the requirement that a cross-examiner, prior to questioning the witness about his own prior statement in writing, must first show it to the witness. Abolished by statute in the country of its origin, the requirement nevertheless gained currency in the United States. This rule abolishes this useless impediment to cross-examination. * * * Both oral and written statements are included.

The provision for disclosure to counsel is designed to protect against unwarranted insinuations that a statement has been made when the fact is to the contrary.

The rule does not defeat the application of Rule 1002 relating to production of the original when the contents of a writing are sought to be proved. Nor does it defeat the application of Rule 26(b)(3) of the Rules of Civil Procedure, as revised, entitling a person on request to a copy of his own statement, though the operation of the latter may be suspended temporarily.”

The federal rule includes a subdivision (b) barring evidence of a prior inconsistent statement unless the witness has been given an opportunity to explain or deny it. Since subdivision (b) is omitted, foundation requirements for admitting inconsistent statements will be governed by case law. See
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 48 (1982).

Rule 614.
Calling and interrogation of witnesses by court.

Calling by court. — The court may, on its own motion or at the suggestion of a party, call witnesses, and all parties are entitled to cross-examine witnesses thus called.

Interrogation by court. — The court may interrogate witnesses, whether called by itself or by a party.

Objections. — No objections are necessary with respect to the calling of a witness by the court or to questions propounded to a witness by the court but it shall be deemed that proper objection has been made and overruled.

History.

1983, c. 701, s. 1.

Commentary

Subdivisions (a) and (b) of this rule are identical to Fed. R. Evid. 614(a) and (b).

Subdivision (a) authorizes the court to call witnesses and is consistent with North Carolina practice. See
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 37 (1982).

Subdivision (b) authorizes the court to examine witnesses, whether called by itself or by a party, and is consistent with North Carolina practice.
Id.

It is anticipated that the court will exercise its authority to call or interrogate a witness only in extraordinary circumstances.

The court may not in calling or interrogating a witness do so in a manner as to suggest an opinion as to the weight of the evidence or the credibility of the witness in violation of

G.S. 15A-1222

or

G.S. 1A-1

, Rule 51(a).
Id.

Subdivision (c) differs from Fed. R. Evid. 614(c) by providing for an automatic objection to the calling or interrogation of witnesses by the court. Subdivision (c) is consistent with N. C. Civ. Pro. Rule 46(a)(3) which provides that no objections are necessary with respect to questions propounded to a witness by the court.

Rule 615.
Exclusion of witnesses.

At the request of a party the court may order witnesses excluded so that they cannot hear the testimony of other witnesses, and it may make the order of its own motion. This rule does not authorize exclusion of (1) a party who is a natural person, or (2) an officer or employee of a party that is not a natural person designated as its representative by its attorney, or (3) a person whose presence is shown by a party to be essential to the presentation of his cause, or (4) a person whose presence is determined by the court to be in the interest of justice.

History.

1983, c. 701, s. 1.

Commentary

This rule is similar to Fed. R. Evid. 615 except that the word “shall” in the first sentence has been changed to “
may
order witnesses excluded,” and the phrase “a person whose presence is determined by the court to be in the interest of justice” has been added as a fourth exception.

The use of “
may
order witnesses excluded” rather than “shall,” as in the federal rule, is intended to preserve discretion in the trial judge, allowing him to take into account such things as the physical setting of the trial. However, the practice should be to sequester witnesses on request of either party unless some reason exists not to.

In North Carolina the usual practice has been to separate witnesses and send them out of the hearing of the court when requested, but this has been discretionary with the trial judge and not a matter of right. See
Brandis on North Carolina Evidence
§ 20 (1982).

G.S. 15A-1225

, which codifies this practice, should be amended to conform to Rule 615.

The Advisory Committee’s Note states:

“The efficacy of excluding or sequestering witnesses has long been recognized as a means of discouraging and exposing fabrication, inaccuracy and collusion. 6 Wigmore §§ 1837-1838. The authority of the judge is admitted, the only question being whether the matter is committed to his discretion or one of right. The rule takes the latter position. No time is specified for making the request.

Several categories of persons are excepted. (1) Exclusion of persons who are parties would raise serious problems of confrontation and due process. Under accepted practice they are not subject to exclusion. 6 Wigmore § 1841. (2) As the equivalent of the right of a natural-person party to be present, a party which is not a natural person is entitled to have a representative present. Most of the cases have involved allowing a police officer who has been in charge of an investigation to remain in court despite the fact that he will be a witness. * * * Designation of the representative by the attorney rather than by the client may at first glance appear to be an inversion of the attorney-client relationship, but it may be assumed that the attorney will follow the wishes of the client, and the solution is simple and workable. * * * (3) The category contemplates such persons as an agent who handled the transaction being litigated or an expert needed to advise counsel in the management of the litigation. See 6 Wigmore § 1841, n. 4.”

A government investigative agent would be within the second exception. See S. Rept. No. 93-1277, 93d Cong., 2d Sess. (1974). The third category would include an expert listening to testimony for the purpose of testifying in his capacity as an expert.

A fourth exception to Rule 615 was added to provide that the rule does not authorize the exclusion of a person whose presence is determined by the court to be in the interest of justice. For example, when a minor child is testifying the court may determine that it is in the interest of justice for the parent or guardian to be present even though the parent or guardian is to be called subsequently. When this exception is relied upon the court should state the reasons supporting its determination that the presence of the person is in the interest of justice.

Rule 616.
Alternative testimony of witnesses with an intellectual or developmental disability in civil cases and special proceedings.

Definitions. — The following definitions apply to this section:

The definitions set out in

G.S. 122C-3

.

Remote testimony. — A method by which a witness testifies outside of an open forum and outside of the physical presence of a party or parties.

Remote Testimony Authorized. — An individual with an intellectual or developmental disability who is competent to testify may testify by remote testimony in a civil proceeding or special proceeding if the court determines by clear and convincing evidence that the witness would suffer serious emotional distress from testifying in the presence of a named party or parties or from testifying in an open forum and that the ability of the witness to communicate with the trier of fact would be impaired by testifying in the presence of a named party or parties or from testifying in an open forum.

Hearing Procedure. — Upon motion of a party or the court’s own motion, and for good cause shown, the court shall hold an evidentiary hearing to determine whether to allow remote testimony. The hearing shall be recorded unless recordation is waived by all parties. The presence of the witness is not required at the hearing unless so ordered by the presiding judge.

Order. — An order allowing or disallowing the use of remote testimony shall state the findings and conclusions of law that support the court’s determination. An order allowing the use of remote testimony also shall do all of the following:

State the method by which the witness is to testify.

List any individual or category of individuals allowed to be in or required to be excluded from the presence of the witness during testimony.

State any special conditions necessary to facilitate the cross-examination of the witness.

State any condition or limitation upon the participation of individuals in the presence of the witness during the testimony.

State any other conditions necessary for taking or presenting testimony.

Testimony. — The method of remote testimony shall allow the trier of fact and all parties to observe the demeanor of the witness as the witness testifies in a similar manner as if the witness were testifying in the open forum. Except as provided in this section, the court shall ensure that the counsel for all parties is physically present where the witness testifies and has a full and fair opportunity for examination and cross-examination of the witness. In a proceeding where a party is representing itself, the court may limit or deny the party from being physically present during testimony if the court finds that the witness would suffer serious emotional distress from testifying in the presence of the party. A party may waive the right to have counsel physically present where the witness testifies.

Nonexclusive Procedure and Standard. — Nothing in this section prohibits the use or application of any other method or procedure authorized or required by law for the introduction into evidence of statements or testimony of an individual with an intellectual or developmental disability.

History.

2009-514, s. 1; 2018-47, s. 3(a).